Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3313
Support, defined.

Support in the definitions of child support, medical support, and spousal support means providing necessary shelter, food, clothing, care, medical support, medical attention, education expenses, or funeral expenses or any other reasonable and necessary expense.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 4.